Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Chapter 16. Parole Administration.
Sec. 33.16.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

[Repealed, § 72,ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017.]

“administrative sanctions and incentives” means responses by a parole officer to a parolee’s compliance with or violation of the conditions of parole under AS

33.16.180

.

“board” means the board of parole;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of corrections;

“controlled substance” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in the schedules set out in AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

;

“crime against a person” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

;

“crime involving domestic violence” and “domestic violence” have the meanings given in AS

18.66.990

;

“department” means the Department of Corrections;

“discretionary parole” means the release of a prisoner by the board before the expiration of a term, subject to conditions imposed by the board and subject to its custody and jurisdiction; “discretionary parole” does not include “special medical parole”;

“mandatory parole” means the release of a prisoner who was sentenced to one or more terms of imprisonment of two years or more, for the period of good time credited under AS 33.20, subject to conditions imposed by the board and subject to its custody and jurisdiction;

“parolee” means a prisoner, sentenced to one or more terms of imprisonment exceeding 180 days in the case of discretionary parole and of two years or more in the case of mandatory parole, released by the board or by operation of law before the expiration of the term, subject to the custody and jurisdiction of the board;

“prisoner” means an offender confined for a violation of state law, but does not include a person confined under AS 47;

“severely medically or cognitively disabled” means that a person has a medical condition, or a cognitive condition, that substantially reduces the ability to commit an offense similar to the offense for which the person was convicted or to commit an offense in violation of AS 11.41 that is punishable as a felony, and the person is likely to

remain subject to the severe medical or cognitive condition throughout the entire period of parole; or

die from the medical or cognitive condition;

“special medical parole” means the release by the board before the expiration of a term, subject to conditions imposed by the board and subject to its custody and jurisdiction, of a prisoner who is severely medically or cognitively disabled;

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am §§ 6, 7 ch 77 SLA 1987; am §§ 10, 11 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 55 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 49 SLA 1997; am §§ 5, 6 ch 25 SLA 2003; am § 152 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 72 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

33.16.260

.
Renumbered in 1986.

In 1995, paragraphs (13) and (14) were enacted as (11) and (12), in 1996, paragraph (7) was enacted as (13), and in 2016, paragraph (2) was enacted as (15); the paragraphs were renumbered to maintain the alphabetical order of the terms.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (15) [now (2)].

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, repealed (1).